Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.090

Alternative plan of government.

Proposals for each of the plans of government authorized by this title may be placed on the ballots in the same election by timely petition as provided in this chapter. When the ballot contains alternative proposals for each of the plans of government the ballot shall clearly state that voters may vote for only one of the plans of government.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.090.]

NOTES: